District of Columbia statutes.
5-501.01

Increase denied for unsatisfactory service; removal for inefficiency; additional compensation for outstanding efficiency.

No annual increase in salary shall be paid to any person who, in the judgment of the Mayor of the District of Columbia, has not rendered satisfactory service, and any private who fails to receive such annual increase for 2 successive years shall be deemed inefficient and forthwith removed from the service by the Mayor; provided, that under such rules and regulations as the Council of the District of Columbia shall promulgate, the Chief of Police and the Fire Chief of the Fire Department shall select and report to the Mayor from time to time the names of privates and sergeants in each Department who by reason of demonstrated ability may be considered as possessed of outstanding efficiency, and the Mayor is authorized and directed to grant to not exceeding 10% of the authorized strength, respectively, of such privates and sergeants in each Department additional compensation at the rate of $5 per month; provided further, that the Mayor may withdraw such compensation at any time and remove any name or names from among such selections.

July 1, 1930, 46 Stat. 840, ch. 783, § 4
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(111) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 4-802.
1981 Ed., § 4-401.
This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.
Protection of life, health, and property, regulations, see § 1-303.03.
Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.

Office of Chief Engineer abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-402.

Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-105.01.